Washington statutes.
RCW 9.68.080

Unlawful acts.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any minor to misrepresent his or her true age or his or her true status as the child, stepchild, or ward of a person accompanying him or her, for the purpose of purchasing or obtaining access to any material described in RCW 9.68.050.

(2) It shall be unlawful for any person accompanying such minor to misrepresent his or her true status as parent, spouse of a parent, or guardian of any minor for the purpose of enabling such minor to purchase or obtain access to material described in RCW 9.68.050.

[ 2011 c 336 s 319; 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 16.]

NOTES:

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 256: See note following RCW 9.68.050.